src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/tr.aff
LANG tr_TR
SET UTF-8
TRY  iI   Çç  ÜüÖö-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'
FLAG num

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0  lmamakla .
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 nulmazl   na .
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 t rabildi i .
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 leyicilerini .
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0  t ran .
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 mizden .
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 leyicilerine .
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 tti ini .
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 melerindense .
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 tti ine .
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 undakilerin .
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 lemediler .
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 ümlerinde .
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 le ememesinden .
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 lenmeyen .
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0  labilmekte .
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 la  m ndan .
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 ebilece imi .
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 malar ndand  .
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 ebilece ime .
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 layabilseydik .
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 la mad klar ndan .
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 ulmu u .
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0  abileceklerinden .
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 lamamakla .
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0   lar n  .
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 t rs n .
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 lendirenlerin .
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 ndeyken .
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 yabilenleri .
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 lanamam   .
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 ebilece ini .
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 inkiyle .
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 d rarak .
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 tiyordu .
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 ebilece ine .
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0  mlar n .
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 leneyim .
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 üklü ünün .
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 d r lman n .
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 turulmalar  .
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 le tirilebiliyor .
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 ü lerindeki .
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 temeyeceklerini .
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 nemedi inde .
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 durmayacaklar n  .
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 mam  lar .
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 temeyeceklerine .
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 dirilemeyece ini .
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 le tirildiklerini .
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0  l   n .
SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 lendirmelerine .
SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0  l   m .
SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 d rmal s n z .
SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 le mi lerdi .
SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 d yd  .
SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 lan rs n z .
SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 lendirmelerini .
SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 leyiciler .
SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 t rd   n n .
SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 salla t r lm   .
SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0  l   d r .
SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 e .
SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 a .
SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 ulamayan .
SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 n .
SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 la t   n zda .
SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0   t rd k .
SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 ülmeyecek .
SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 duram yor .
SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 m .
SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 tti imi .
SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 i .
SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 lendirmeyen .
SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 dirilemeyece ine .
SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 imiyse .
SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 u .
SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 t .
SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0  abildiklerini .
SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 r .
SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 temedi i .
SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 ülebildi .
SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 le tirilmelerinde .
SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 l la t rd    .
SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 amay  lar na .
SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 'm z  .
SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 m   na .
SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0   s n .
SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0   man n .
SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 amay  lar n  .
SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 tüldü ünden .
SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 tamam   m .
SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 tirdiklerini .
SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 lat lacak .
SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 la  lamayacak .
SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 tirdiklerine .
SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 t labilecektir .
SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 lenmeyin .
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 lenmeyip .
SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 s ndakine .
SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 lenmeyiz .
SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 leyicilik .
SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 layabilece imizi .
SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0  m zs n z .
SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 t rd   n z .
SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 s ndakini .
SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 iveriyorlar .
SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 cülü ünü .
SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 ndirmeleri .
SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0   man z .
SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 timin .
SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 unuzda .
SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 le mesinin .
SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 nemedi inin .
SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 t lmamal d r .
SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 lenememi ler .
SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 ulmu ken .
SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 üydüm .
SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 i emeyecek .
SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 le imindeki .
SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 meseydim .
SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 sellerin .
SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 le emediklerinden .
SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 lamakt r .
SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 meseydin .
SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 le tiremeyece inin .
SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 diremedik .
SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 mazlar ndan .
SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 la t ramazlar .
SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 mayaca  m za .
SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 diremedim .
SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 leyememesi .
SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 tebilecekleri .
SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 meseydik .
SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 tmas nlar .
SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 lenmeyece inin .
SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 edursun .
SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 lerindeki .
SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 celerinden .
SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 celerden .
SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 i imleri .
SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 l s yla .
SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 imindekileri .
SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 direceklerinin .
SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0  l   n  .
SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 la amamazl klar  .
SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 nmi li i .
SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 amayaca  ndayd  .
SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 lanmas n .
SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 lar ndansa .
SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 am yormu  .
SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 c m zda .
SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0  m  lar .
SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 cülerine .
SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 d yor .
SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 ücülü ün .
SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 cülerini .
SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 l s yd  .
SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0    ld   n  .
SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0   lamayaca  n n .
SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 ü .
SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 la t r yor .
SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 umdaki .
SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 le tirilemezdi .
SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 le mi lerin .
SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 la t r rsak .
SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 lamamakta .
SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 land r labilece ini .
SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 le ebilece ine .
SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0  emeyece ine .
SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 le ebilece ini .
SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 t lan n .
SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0  t rm  lard  .
SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0  emeyece ini .
SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 lanm yorlar .
SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 t c lar n .
SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 t lanlar .
SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 diniz .
SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0  lmamakta .
SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 la t rabilmek .
SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 la t rmakla .
SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0   .
SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 tilece ini .
SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 diremeden .
SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 d r lamad  .
SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 i ti inden .
SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 tilece ine .
SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 lanamam  lar .
SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 leyemediler .
SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 tirebildiklerini .
SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 t lm   .
SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 latabilir .
SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 nacaklard  .
SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 mesindendir .
SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 ç lar m z n .
SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 ilemeyerek .
SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 li ime .
SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 uydular .
SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 la t rabildi ini .
SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 land r labilece ine .
SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 la t rabildi ine .
SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0  lm  l   n  .
SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 m  san .
SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 layacaklar n .
SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 m  sam .
SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 layabilenlerin .
SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 m  sak .
SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 iyordur .
SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 l y m .
SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 iyordun .
SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 iyordum .
SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0   .
SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 lenmeyecekleri .
SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 li imi .
SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 iyorduk .
SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 lanabilece ine .
SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 sindekiler .
SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0   t r lamayacak .
SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 lanabilece ini .
SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 lendirmeyle .
SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 l y z .
SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 ilmemi tir .
SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 n na .
SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 li ine .
SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 leyebilece imiz .
SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 iysen .
SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 i mi lerdi .
SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 i lerden .
SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 lan yormu  .
SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 nmamas nda .
SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0  mamas na .
SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 nilince .
SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 la mas n .
SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 lardakilerden .
SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 mi lik .
SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 li ini .
SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 amayaca  d r .
SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 tmamas na .
SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 lataca  n  .
SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 ulu unda .
SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 t rman z .
SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 sall klar na .
SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 t rman n .
SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 ilmemenin .
SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 lar mda .
SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 isin .
SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 meyeceksiniz .
SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 dürdüklerine .
SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 dürdüklerini .
SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 nebilmelidir .
SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 ' d r .
SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 emedi i .
SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 l l klar  .
SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 t r lmam  t r .
SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 n m n .
SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0  ncaya .
SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 culu undaki .
SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 mayaca  m z  .
SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 y c lar n .
SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 mizdir .
SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0   t rmalar .
SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 lamaktalar .
SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 namayarak .
SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 esin .
SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 esim .
SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 la  lmaz .
SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 sall klar n  .
SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 l yd n z .
SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 dakilerden .
SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 nmi ken .
SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0  t klar n n .
SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 tu unuz .
SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 çu um .
SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0  mazlar .
SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 tu unun .
SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 nmayarak .
SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 'dekilerin .
SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0    mlar  .
SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 0  n zdakileri .
SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 0 ememi imdir .
SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 0 lenmemize .
SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 0 likteydi .
SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 d ramaman n .
SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 0 l lar ndan .
SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 0 lendirilemeyece inin .
SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 0 turabilece i .
SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 dirilmesidir .
SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 0 lenmemizi .
SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 çiniz .
SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 le tirilece i .
SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 le mesinde .
SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 0  labilmelerini .
SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 0 munu .
SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 undakilerle .
SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 0 le mekten .
SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 0 emeyi inin .
SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 çinin .
SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 0 lay c l   yla .
SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 cülü üne .
SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 0 mas ndayd  .
SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 0 temeyece inin .
SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0  lm  l   na .
SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 0 mamal lar .
SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0  labilmelerine .
SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 0 üldüm .
SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 0  n z  .
SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 la t ramayaca  m .
SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 0 d r lamam  t r .
SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 'dayd k .
SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 'dayd m .
SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 üldük .
SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 0 lanamay   na .
SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 l s ysa .
SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 0 ilmeyecektir .
SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 0 ülen .
SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 tanlardan .
SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 latabilece ine .
SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 0 le tirmesiyle .
SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 tilmesinde .
SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0  t rsa .
SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 mu sun .
SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 'dekinden .
SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 0 liklerindedir .
SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0  anlar  .
SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 0 latabilece ini .
SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 0  t   n .
SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 0 tirdikten .
SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 üyorum .
SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 0 la t rmakta .
SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 nilece i .
SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 nundan .
SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 ilemezler .
SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 0 tilse .
SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 0 ili ler .
SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 0  labilmeleri .
SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 leredir .
SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 ümünüz .
SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 tiyorum .
SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 0 u tu undan .
SFX 439 N 1
SFX 439 0 leyememenin .
SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 ümünün .
SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 ulabilecektir .
SFX 441 N 1
SFX 441 0 imiydi .
SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 tiyoruz .
SFX 444 N 1
SFX 444 0 lendirmeyece ini .
